Oklahoma, session 2025, SB862.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 683.24C of Title 63, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The constitutional role of government personnel, elected and
employed, and all government agencies, during emergencies and
disasters, is to aid residents of this state.
B. All government personnel, elected and employed, and all
government agencies have no authority to subvert the constitutional
rights of the residents of this state, even during times of
emergency or disaster.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB862 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

C. All government personnel, elected and employed, and all
government agencies are prohibited from enacting or imposing any
actions subverting the constitutional rights of the residents of
this state, even during times of emergency or disaster.
D. Examples of actions that shall be considered subversions of
constitutional rights shall include:
1. Requiring or compelling residents to receive a shot,
vaccine, inoculation, or any other medical treatment;
2. Requiring or compelling residents to wear a mask or medical
device, with the exception of first responders and medical
personnel;
3. Restricting any right to medical treatment based on
vaccination status, confiscating personal property, restricting
constitutional freedoms, or restraining a patient involuntarily
unless otherwise required by law;
4. Requiring or compelling residents to show any documentation
of vaccination status that was not already required by law prior to
the emergency or disaster;
5. Imposing any unconstitutional law, regulation, or
restriction on businesses, churches, organizations, or residents
that was not codified in law prior to the emergency or disaster;
6. Restricting the rights of residents to exercise free speech,
to peaceably assemble and gather in large groups, and to petition
government for the redress of grievances, and restricting any other
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB862 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Firs t Amendment right in any way that was not codified in law prior
to the emergency or disaster;
7. Restricting the rights of residents to exercise any Second
Amendment right in any way that was not codified in law prior to the
emergency or disaster; and
8. Restricting the rights of residents to travel freely in any
way that was not codified in law prior to the emergency or disaster.
E. Any government official, elected or employed, who violates
the provisions of this section shall, upon conviction, be guilty of
a felony punishable by imprisonment in the custody of the Department
of Corrections for not more than five (5) years, a fine not more
than Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00), or by both such
imprisonment and fine. The convicted government official shall also
be subject to:
1. Removal from his or her office or position;
2. Prohibition from holding any future elected or public
office;
3. A fine of Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00) per violation;
and
4. Personal assumption of all liability where the government
would otherwise be liable.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON PUBLIC SAFETY
February 25, 2025 - DO PASS AS AMENDED BY CS

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB862 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)